Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. Lime

§ 3261.
Packing and branding of lime.

Lime packed in casks for sale shall be put into good and sufficient casks.
Each cask shall be branded with the name of the town in which the lime was manufactured and the name of the manufacturer or vendor of the same.

§ 3262.
Penalties.

A person who sells or offers for sale lime in a cask not branded as required by section 3261 of this title shall be fined $5.00.

A person who defaces or changes a brand made as required by section 3261, or puts up for sale other lime than that which was first packed in the cask, branded as required by section 3261, to the injury of another person, shall be fined $5.00, and be liable to pay the damages to a person injured thereby.